Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB912.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 446 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The title of any act of the General Assembly that contains "an
appropriation" or "declaring an emergency" or similar terms shall not be
definitive of whether the act contains an appropriation or declares an
emergency. Inclusion of these terms in the title of any act shall be
interpreted or construed solely as providing notification to members of the
General Assembly of the potential of a higher vote threshold requirement.
(b) The determination of whether an act of the General Assembly contains an
appropriation or declares an emergency shall be made as established by the
Rules of the Senate, the Rules of the House of Representatives, and
applicable law.
(2) Any section in an act of the General Assembly that sets out a justification for
declaring an emergency may be considered by the courts as a justification for the
emergency only, and shall not be considered as evidencing legislative intent
regarding the enactment itself.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/3/2026 9:29 AM Jacketed